District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-301.05

Office of Contracting and Procurement; authority.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 105, 32 DCR 7396
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-258, § 2(b), 38 DCR 974
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(c), 44 DCR 1423
May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(b), 45 DCR 1687
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 402(a), 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 8, 46 DCR 2118
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 4(a), 48 DCR 1873
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-281, § 2, 50 DCR 893
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 102(a), 51 DCR 881
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1181.5.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Procurement Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-17, September 12, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5459)
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 through 4 of the Vendor Payment and Drug Abuse, Alcohol Abuse, and Mental Illness Coverage Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-181, March 26, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3407).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Chief Technology Officer Year 2000 Remediation Procurement Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-17, July 17 1999, law notification 46 DCR 6314).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Vendor Payment Authorization Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-130, May 2, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4405).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Procurement Practices Vendor Payment Revised Approval Authorization Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-100, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3620).
Provision for payment of vendors: For temporary allowance of the District of Columbia government to receive and pay valid claims for certain vendors who provided goods and services to the Department of Human Services from October 1, 1994, through July 31, 1995, without benefit of a valid written contract, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Vendor Payment Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-84, June 30, 1995, 42 DCR 3567).
For temporary provisions allowing the District to receive and pay valid claims for certain vendors who provided goods and services to certain District agencies between October 1, 1994 and July 31, 1995, without benefit of a valid written contract, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Equitable Relief for Vendors Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-121, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4115).
For temporary allowance of the District government to receive and pay valid claims of certain persons and vendors who provided goods and services to J.B. Johnson Nursing Center November 20, 1995, through November 29, 1995, without the benefit of a valid written contract with the District government, see §§ 2 to 6 of the Equitable Relief for Certain Persons and Vendors of J.B. Johnson Nursing Center Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-186, January 25, 1996, 43 DCR 382). For temporary allowance, on an emergency basis, of the District of Columbia government to receive and pay valid claims for certain vendors who provided goods or services to the Department of Human Services without benefit of a valid written contract, see §§ 2-7 of the Vendor Payment Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-491, January 13, 1997, 44 DCR 754). For temporary allowance, on an emergency basis, of the District of Columbia government to receive and pay valid claims for certain vendors who provided goods or services to the District without benefit of a valid written purchase order or contract, see §§ 2-4 of the Vendor Payment and Drug Abuse, Alcohol Abuse, and Mental Illness Coverage Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-396, September 16, 1998, 45 DCR 6952). For temporary authorization for the District of Columbia Public Library to pay outstanding invoices, see §§ 2 and 3 of the District of Columbia Public Library Vendor Payment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-102, July 2, 1997, 44 DCR 4197). For temporary authorization for the District of Columbia Public Library to pay outstanding invoices for goods and services procured during Fiscal Year 1996 through March 1, 1997, but not received until after March 1, 1997, for which the required purchase orders have not been entered into the Financial Management System, see §§ 2-4a of the Public Library Vendor Payment Extension Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-157, October 16, 1997, 44 DCR 6046). For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Procurement Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-62, April 15, 1997, 44 DCR 2413), and § 3(b) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-133, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 4832). For temporary amendment of section, see § 202(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794) and § 202(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669). For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-374, April 24, 1998, 45 DCR 4338). For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 202(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446). For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Vendor Payment Authorization Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-242, January 28, 2002, 49 DCR 1028). For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Procurement Practices Vendor Payment Revised Approval Authorization Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-236, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10905). For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Procurement Practices Vendor Payment Revised Approval Authorization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-377, February 19, 2004, 51 DCR 2639). For temporary (90 day) authorization of payment, see § 2 of Hawk One Security, Inc. Payment Authorization Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-363, May 5, 2008, 55 DCR 5683).
Amendment of Mayor’s Order 86-44 Delegation of Contracting Authority, see Mayor’s Order 88-2, December 15, 1987.
Amendment of Mayor’s Order 86-45, Delegation of Small Purchase Authority, see Mayor’s Order 88-102, December 15, 1987.
Delegation of contracting authority, see Mayor’s Order 88-193, August 19, 1988; Mayor’s Order 88-273, December 30, 1988, as amended by Mayor’s Order 89-215, September 27, 1989 and Mayor’s Order 90-94, July 3, 1990; Mayor’s Order 90-178, November 19, 1990; Mayor’s Memorandum 89-46, November 29, 1989; Mayor’s Order 91-92, June 7, 1991; Mayor’s Order 92-153, December 1, 1992.
Amendment of Mayor’s Order 90-178, Delegation of contracting authority: See Mayor’s Order 95-45, March 23, 1995.
Delegation of contracting authority: See Mayor’s Order 95-168, December 7, 1995.
Amendment of Mayor’s Order 90-178, Delegation of Contracting Authority: See Mayor’s Order 96-83, June 20, 1996 ( 43 DCR 3510).
Amendment of Mayor’s Order 90-178, Delegation of Contracting Authority: See Mayor’s Order 96-136, September 9, 1996 (43
Amendment of Mayor’s Order 96-172, Establishing Position of Administrator in the Commission on Mental Health Services; Appointment of Interim Administrator; Duties of Administrator: See Mayor’s Order 97-6, January 9, 1997 ( 44 DCR 357).